sv: Fjärrstyrd motorcykel – terränglämplighet: Terräng; Blandade ytor inomhus; Släta golv inomhus; Terräng (jord); Terräng (gräs); Terräng (grus); Terräng (sand); Väg (asfalt); Skatepark/stuntytor; Annat
th: ความเหมาะสมของรถจักรยานยนต์บังคับวิทยุต่อสภาพภูมิประเทศ: ทุกสภาพภูมิประเทศ; พื้นผิวในร่มแบบผสม; พื้นเรียบในร่ม; ออฟโรด (ดิน); ออฟโรด (หญ้า); ออฟโรด (กรวด); ออฟโรด (ทราย); บนถนน (พื้นผิวถนน); ลานสเก็ต / พื้นที่เล่นผาดโผน; อื่นๆ
ko: 원격 조종 오토바이 적합 지형: 전지형; 실내 혼합 표면; 실내 매끄러운 바닥; 오프로드(흙); 오프로드(잔디); 오프로드(자갈); 오프로드(모래); 온로드(포장도로); 스케이트 파크/스턴트 표면; 기타
da: Fjernbetjent motorcykels egnethed til terræn: Alt terræn; Blandede indendørs overflader; Glat indendørs gulv; Offroad (jord); Offroad (græs); Offroad (grus); Offroad (sand); Onroad (asfalt); Skaterpark/stuntoverflader; Andet
it: Motocicletta telecomandata adatta al terreno: Tutti i terreni; Superfici miste indoor; Pavimento liscio indoor; Fuoristrada (sterrato); Fuoristrada (erba); Fuoristrada (ghiaia); Fuoristrada (sabbia); Su strada (asfalto); Skate park / superfici per acrobazie; Altro
hr-HR: Prikladnost terena za motocikle na daljinsko upravljanje: Svi tereni; Unutarnje mješovite površine; Unutarnji glatki pod; Izvan ceste (zemlja); Izvan ceste (trava); Izvan ceste (šljunak); Izvan ceste (pijesak); Na cesti (asfalt); Skate park / površine za vratolomije; Ostalo
pl: Zdalnie sterowany motocykl przystosowany do jazdy w terenie: Terenowe; Różne nawierzchnie wewnątrz; Gładkie podłogi wewnątrz; Terenowe (ziemia); Terenowe (trawa); Terenowe (żwir); Terenowe (piasek); Szosowe (nawierzchnia utwardzona); Skatepark / nawierzchnie wyczynowe; Inne
nl: RC-motorfiets terreingeschiktheid: All-terrain; Gemengde binnenoppervlakken; Gladde binnenvloer; Offroad (zand); Offroad (gras); Offroad (gravel); Offroad (zand); On-road (verhard); Skatepark / stuntoppervlakken; Overig
tr: Uzaktan kumandalı motosiklet arazi uygunluğu: Tüm araziler; İç mekan karma yüzeyler; İç mekan pürüzsüz zemin; Arazi (toprak); Arazi (çim); Arazi (çakıl); Arazi (kum); Yol (asfalt); Paten parkı / akrobasi yüzeyleri; Diğer
bg-BG: Пригодност на радиоуправляем мотор за терен: Всякакви терени; Смесени повърхности на закрито; Гладки подове на закрито; Офроуд (пръст); Офроуд (трева); Офроуд (чакъл); Офроуд (пясък); На пътя (асфалт); Скейт парк / повърхности за каскади; Други
nb: Terrengegnethet for fjernstyrt motorsykkel: Allterreng; Blandede overflater innendørs; Glatt gulv innendørs; Offroad (jord); Offroad (gress); Offroad (grus); Offroad (sand); På vei (asfalt); Skeitepark / overflater for triksing; Annet
pt-PT: Adequação da mota de controlo remoto ao terreno: Todo-o-terreno; Superfícies mistas de interior; Chão liso de interior; Off-road (terra); Off-road (relva); Off-road (gravilha); Off-road (areia); On-road (pavimento); Skate park/superfícies para acrobacias; Outra
zh-TW: 遙控機車地形適用性: 全地形; 室內混合地面; 室內平滑地面; 越野 (泥土); 越野 (草地); 越野 (碎石); 越野 (沙地); 公路 (鋪裝路面); 滑板場/特技場地; 其他
pt-BR: Controle remoto motocicleta terreno adequação: Qualquer terreno; Superfícies mistas internas; Piso liso interno; Off-road (terra); Off-road (grama); Off-road (cascalho); Off-road (areia); On-road (pavimento); Pista de skate / superfícies para acrobacias; Outro
cs: Vhodnost motocyklu na dálkové ovládání do terénu: Do každého terénu; Vnitřní smíšené povrchy; Vnitřní hladké podlahy; Off-road (hlína); Off-road (tráva); Off-road (štěrk); Off-road (písek); Silniční (asfalt/beton); Skatepark / povrchy na triky; Jiné
fr: Terrain adapté à la moto radiocommandée: Tout-terrain; Surfaces intérieures mixtes; Sol intérieur lisse; Hors route (terre); Hors route (herbe); Hors route (gravier); Hors route (sable); Sur route (asphalte); Skatepark / surfaces pour cascades; Autre
vi: Khả năng thích ứng địa hình của xe máy điều khiển từ xa: Mọi địa hình; Mặt phẳng hỗn hợp trong nhà; Sàn nhẵn trong nhà; Địa hình (đất); Địa hình (cỏ); Địa hình (sỏi); Địa hình (cát); Đường trường (đường nhựa); Công viên trượt ván / mặt phẳng biểu diễn; Khác
es: Adecuación del terreno para la motocicleta a control remoto: Todoterreno; Superficies mixtas en interiores; Suelo liso en interiores; Todoterreno (tierra); Todoterreno (césped); Todoterreno (grava); Todoterreno (arena); En carretera (pavimento); Pistas de patinaje/superficies para acrobacias; Otro
sl-SI: Primernost daljinsko vodenega motorja za terene: Za vse terene; Mešane notranje površine; Gladka notranja tla; Terensko (zemlja); Terensko (trava); Terensko (makadam); Terensko (pesek); Cestno (asfalt); Skateboard park / površine za akrobacije; Drugo
de: Geländeeignung für ferngesteuerte Motorräder: Geländegängig; Gemischte Oberflächen im Innenbereich; Glatte Böden im Innenbereich; Offroad (Erde); Offroad (Gras); Offroad (Kies); Offroad (Sand); Onroad (Asphalt); Skatepark / Stunt-Oberflächen; Sonstiges
hu: Távirányítós motorkerékpár terepalkalmassága: Minden tereptípus; Beltéri vegyes felületek; Beltéri sima padló; Terep (földút); Terep (fű); Terep (kavics); Terep (homok); Aszfalt / útburkolat; Gördeszkapark / trükkfelületek; Egyéb
fi: Kauko-ohjattavan moottoripyörän maastokelpoisuus: Kaikki maastot; Sisätilan sekapinnat; Sisätilan sileä lattia; Maasto (muta); Maasto (ruoho); Maasto (sora); Maasto (hiekka); Tie (päällyste); Skeittipuisto / stunttipinnat; Muu
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru terenul motocicletei cu telecomandă: Toate tipurile de teren; Suprafețe mixte de interior; Podea netedă de interior; Off-road (pământ); Off-road (iarbă); Off-road (pietriș); Off-road (nisip); Pe șosea (asfalt); Skate park / suprafețe pentru cascadorii; Altele
lt-LT: Nuotoliniu būdu valdomo motociklo reljefo tinkamumas: Bet kokiam reljefui; Mišrūs vidaus paviršiai; Lygios vidaus grindys; Bekelė (gruntas); Bekelė (žolė); Bekelė (žvyras); Bekelė (smėlis); Kelias (asfaltas); Riedlenčių parkas / triukų paviršiai; Kita
sk-SK: Vhodnosť motocykla na diaľkové ovládanie do terénu: Do každého terénu; Zmiešané interiérové povrchy; Hladká interiérová podlaha; Do terénu (hlina); Do terénu (tráva); Do terénu (štrk); Do terénu (piesok); Na cestu (asfalt); Skatepark / akrobatické povrchy; Iné
zh-CN: 遥控摩托车地形适应性: 全地形; 室内混合路面; 室内光滑地面; 越野（泥地）; 越野（草地）; 越野（砾石）; 越野（沙地）; 公路（路面）; 滑板公园/特技场地; 其他
ru: Пригодность радиоуправляемого мотоцикла для местности: Вездеходный; Смешанные поверхности в помещении; Гладкий пол в помещении; Бездорожье (грунт); Бездорожье (трава); Бездорожье (гравий); Бездорожье (песок); Шоссе (асфальт); Скейт-парк / площадки для трюков; Другое
en: Remote control motorcycle terrain suitability: All-terrain; Indoor mixed surfaces; Indoor smooth floor; Off-road (dirt); Off-road (grass); Off-road (gravel); Off-road (sand); On-road (pavement); Skate park / stunt surfaces; Other
ja: 遠隔操作バイクの地形適合性: 全地形対応; 屋内複合サーフェス; 屋内の滑らかな床; オフロード（ダート）; オフロード（芝生）; オフロード（砂利）; オフロード（砂）; オンロード（舗装路）; スケートパーク / スタント用サーフェス; その他
el: Κατάλληλο έδαφος για τηλεκατευθυνόμενες μοτοσικλέτες: Παντός εδάφους; Εσωτερικός χώρος (μικτές επιφάνειες); Εσωτερικός χώρος (λεία επιφάνεια); Εκτός δρόμου (χώμα); Εκτός δρόμου (γρασίδι); Εκτός δρόμου (χαλίκι); Εκτός δρόμου (άμμος); Εντός δρόμου (άσφαλτος); Πάρκο skate / επιφάνειες για κόλπα; Άλλο